Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Regulation of Charitable Solicitations

§79-11-501.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases as used in Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless a different meaning is required by the context:

(i) “Charitable organization” means either of the following:

Any person determined by the Internal Revenue Service to be a tax exempt organization pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; or

Any person actually or purporting to be established for any voluntary health and welfare, benevolent, philanthropic, patriotic, educational, humane, scientific, public health, environmental conservation, civic, or other eleemosynary purpose or for the benefit of law enforcement personnel, fire fighters, or other public safety organizations, or any person employing in any manner a charitable appeal as the basis of any solicitation or an appeal that suggests that there is a charitable purpose to any solicitation and includes each local, county or area division within this state of such charitable organization, provided such local, county or area division has authority and discretion to disburse funds or property otherwise than by transfer to any parent organization.

“Charitable organization” is not limited to only those organizations to which contributions are tax deductible under Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Charitable organization” does not include any bona fide duly constituted religious institutions and such separate groups or corporations which form an integral part of religious institutions, provided that:

Such religious institutions, groups or corporations are tax exempt pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code;

No part of their net income inures to the direct benefit of any individual; and

Their conduct is primarily supported by government grants or contracts, funds solicited from their own membership, congregations or previous donors, and fees charged for services rendered.

“Charitable purpose” means either of the following:

Any purpose described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; or

Any voluntary health and welfare, charitable, benevolent, philanthropic, patriotic, educational, humane, scientific, public health, environmental conservation, civic, or other eleemosynary purpose or for the benefit of law enforcement personnel, fire fighters, or other public safety organizations;

“Charitable purpose” is not limited to only those purposes for which contributions are tax deductible under Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Container” means any box, carton, package, receptacle, canister, jar, dispenser, or machine that offers a product for sale or distribution which is or purports to be a solicitation of contributions for a charitable purpose.

“Contribution” means the promise or grant of any money or property of any kind or value, including the promise to pay, except payments by members of an organization for membership fees, dues, fines, assessments or for services rendered to individual members, if membership in such organization confers a bona fide right, privilege, professional standing, honor or other direct benefit, other than the right to vote, elect officers or hold offices, and except money or property received from any governmental authority. Reference to the dollar amount of “contributions” in Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 means in the case of promises to pay, or payments for merchandise or rights of any other description, the value of the total amount promised to be paid or paid for such merchandise or rights and not merely that portion of the purchase price to be applied to a charitable purpose.

“Fund-raising counsel” means a person (i) who for a fixed fee or rate under a written agreement plans, manages, advises or consults with respect to the solicitation in this state of contributions by a charitable organization, (ii) who neither solicits contributions nor directly or indirectly employ, procure or engage any person compensated to solicit contributions, and (iii) who does not at any time, whether directly or indirectly, receive or have custody or control of contributions. A bona fide nontemporary salaried officer or employee of a charitable organization shall not be deemed to be a fund-raising counsel. No attorney, accountant or banker who renders professional services to a charitable organization or advises a person to make a charitable contribution during the course of rendering professional services to that person shall be deemed, as a result of the professional service or advice rendered, to be a fund-raising counsel.

“Person” means any individual, organization, group, association, partnership, corporation, trust or any combination of them or any other entity however established within or without this state.

“Professional fund-raiser” means any person who for compensation or other consideration is retained by a charitable organization to solicit in or from this state contributions for charitable purposes directly or in the form of payment for goods, services or admission to fund-raising events, whether such solicitation is performed personally or through his agents, servants or employees or through agents, servants or employees especially employed by or for a charitable organization who are engaged in the solicitation of contributions, the sale of goods or services or the production of fund-raising events under the direction of such person, or a person who plans, conducts, manages, carries on, advises or consults, whether directly or indirectly, in connection with the solicitation of contributions, sale of goods or services or the production of fund-raising events for or on behalf of any charitable organization, but does not qualify as a fund-raising counsel within the meaning of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, or who engages in the business of or holds himself out as independently engaged in the business of soliciting contributions for such purposes. A bona fide officer or employee of a charitable organization shall not be deemed a professional fund-raiser unless his salary or other compensation is paid as a commission which is computed on the basis of funds to be raised or actually raised.

“Professional solicitor” means any person who is employed or retained for compensation by a professional fund-raiser to solicit contributions for charitable purposes from persons in this state.

“Public safety organization” means a nongovernmental organization that uses in its name, whether in a publication of the organization, in a solicitation for contributions to the organizations, for membership in the organization, or to purchase advertising in a publication of the organization, or in a solicitation to purchase products or tickets to an event sponsored by or for the benefit of the organization by a solicitor, the term officer, peace officer, police officer, police law enforcement, reserve officer, deputy, deputy sheriff, constable, deputy constable, fireman, fire fighter, volunteer fireman, emergency medical service provider, civil employee or any other term in a manner that reasonably implies that the organization or that a contribution, purchase or membership will benefit public safety personnel.

“Solicitation” or “solicit” means the request, directly or indirectly, for money, credit, property, financial assistance, or any other thing of value on the plea or representation that such money, credit, property, financial assistance, or any other thing of value or a portion of it will be used for a charitable purpose or will benefit a charitable organization. “Solicitation” or “solicit” includes, but is not limited to, the following methods of requesting or securing money, credit, property, financial assistance or any other thing of value:

Any oral or written request.

The making of any announcement in the press, over the radio or television, by telephone, through the mail or any other media concerning an appeal or campaign by or for any charitable organization or purpose.

The distribution, circulation, posting or publishing of any handbill, written advertisement or other publication which directly or by implication seeks to obtain a contribution.

The offer of, attempt to sell, or sale of any advertising space, book, card, tag, coupon, device, magazine, membership, merchandise, subscription, flower, ticket, candy, cookies or other tangible item in connection with which any appeal is made for any charitable organization or purpose, or where the name of any charitable organization is used or referred to in any appeal as an inducement or reason for making any sale, or where any statement is made that the whole or any part of the proceeds from the sale will be used for any charitable purpose or will benefit any charitable organization.

The use or employment of container, canisters, cards, receptacles or similar devices for the collection of money or other thing of value in connection with which any appeal is made for any charitable organization or purpose.

Any announcement requesting the public to attend an appeal, assemblage, athletic or competitive event, carnival, circus, concert, contest, dance, entertainment, exhibition, exposition, game, lecture, meal, party, show, social gathering or other performance or event of any kind.

A solicitation shall take place whether or not the person making the solicitation receives any contribution, except that a charitable organization’s use of its own name in any communication shall not alone be sufficient to constitute a solicitation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

Requirement that board of charitable organization defined in this section, incorporated on or after January 1, 2012, and soliciting contributions in Mississippi, consist of not less than three directors, see § 79-11-235.

Assets of dissolved charitable organization, as defined in this section, to be transferred to another charitable organization, as defined in this section, see § 79-11-336.

Filing annual registration statement, see § 79-11-503.

Provisions of Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code, see 26 USCS § 170.

Provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, see 26 USCS § 501(c)(3).

Criminal offenses under statutes and ordinances regulating charitable solicitations. 76 A.L.R.3d 924.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership list. 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

Lack of consideration as barring enforcement of promise to make charitable contribution or subscription – modern cases. 86 A.L.R.4th 241.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities §§ 162 et seq.

3 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 187, Charities.

14 C.J.S., Charities §§ 15 et seq.

§79-11-503.
Registration statement; filing fee; forms; records; exceptions; final report upon expiration of registration of corporation opting not to renew registration; report contents.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 79-11-505 and prior to any solicitation of contributions, every charitable organization as defined in Section 79-11-501 which solicits or intends to solicit contributions by any means whatsoever shall file a registration statement with, and pay a filing fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) to, the Secretary of State. A registration statement that contains false, misleading, deceptive or incomplete information or documentation shall not be considered sufficient. The registration statement shall be on forms prescribed by the Secretary of State and shall contain the following information and such other information that the Secretary of State may require by rule:

The name of the organization and the name or names under which it intends to solicit contributions;

The names and addresses of the officers, directors, trustees and chief executive officer of the organization;

The addresses of the organization and any offices in this state. If the organization does not maintain a principal office, the name and address of the person having custody of its financial records;

Where and when the organization was legally established, the form of its organization and its tax-exempt status;

The purpose for which the organization and the purpose or purposes for which the contributions to be solicited will be used;

The date on which the fiscal year of the organization ends;

Whether the organization is authorized by any other governmental authority to solicit contributions and a statement of (i) whether the charitable organization or any of its present officers, directors, executive personnel or trustees have ever had a license or registration denied, suspended, revoked or enjoined by any court or other governmental authority in this state or any other state, or (ii) whether the charitable organization has voluntarily entered into an assurance or voluntary discontinuance or agreement with any jurisdiction or federal agency or officer;

The names and addresses of any professional fundraisers or fund-raising counsel who are acting or have agreed to act on behalf of the organization;

Methods by which solicitation will be made;

Copies of contracts between charitable organizations and professional fundraisers or fund-raising counsel relating to financial compensation or profit to be derived by the professional fundraisers or fund-raising counsel. If any such contract is executed after filing of a registration statement, a copy thereof shall be filed within ten (10) days of the date of execution;

The board, group or individual having final authority over the distribution, custody and use of contributions received;

A financial report as required by Section 79-11-507;

With the initial registration only, a copy of the current charter, articles of incorporation, agreement of association, instrument of trust, constitution, or other organizational instrument and a copy of the bylaws of the charitable organization; and

With the initial registration or, if after registration, within thirty (30) days after its receipt, a copy of any federal tax exemption determination letter, any correspondence rescinding the charitable organization’s tax-exempt status, or any notification from the Internal Revenue Service of any challenge to or investigation of the charitable organization’s continued entitlement to federal tax exemption.

The registration statement shall be signed and sworn to under penalties of perjury by the president or other authorized officer and the chief fiscal officer of the organization.

The Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of registration to a charitable organization once the Secretary of State determines that such organization has complied with all provisions of this chapter. No charitable organization required to be registered under this section shall solicit funds without a valid certificate of registration.

Such registration shall remain in effect until the time for annual renewal. A charitable organization shall renew registration by filing forms prescribed by the Secretary of State and paying the Fifty Dollar ($50.00) renewal fee on or before the fifteenth day of the fifth month following the close of the charitable organization’s taxable year.

The Secretary of State pursuant to Section 79-11-509 may promulgate rules to provide for extensions of the due date for filing of the annual renewal required by this section and may impose an administrative penalty against any organization which fails to comply with this section within the time prescribed, or fails to furnish such additional information as is requested by the Secretary of State within the required time.

Every registered organization shall notify the Secretary of State within thirty (30) days of any change in the information required to be furnished by such organization under Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529.

In no event shall a registered charitable organization continue to solicit contributions in or from this state after the date such organization should have filed, but failed to file, a renewal and the financial report in accordance with the requirements of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529.

If any local, county or area division of a charitable organization is supervised and controlled by a superior or parent organization, incorporated, qualified to do business, or doing business within this state, such local, county or area division shall not be required to register under this section if the superior or parent organization files a registration statement on behalf of the local, county or area division in addition to or as part of its own registration statement. If a registration statement has been filed by a superior or parent organization as provided in Section 79-11-503(1), it shall file the annual report required under Section 79-11-507 on behalf of the local, county or area division in addition to or as part of its own report, but the accounting information required under Section 79-11-507 shall be set forth separately and not in consolidated form with respect to every local, county or area division which raises or expends more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00).

Any registered charitable organization which for any reason opts not to renew its registration must, upon the expiration of its registration, provide to the Secretary of State a final report including the following, in addition to such other information the Secretary of State may require by rule:

For domestic charitable organizations which have dissolved pursuant to the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act;

All financial statements and reports required by Section 79-11-507;

Articles of dissolution and certified minutes reflecting the dissolution;

A list of officers and trustees of the corporation, including their addresses and telephone numbers; and

A statement signed by an officer of the corporation providing details of the final distribution of assets.

For all other charitable organizations, foreign or domestic, which opt not to renew for any other reason:

All financial statements and reports required by Section 79-11-507; and

A statement signed by an officer of the charitable organization certifying that the organization has ceased charitable solicitations within the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 5; Laws, 2016, ch. 313, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

The 2009 amendment substituted “Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00)” for “Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00)” at the end of (7); and added (8).

The 2016 amendment rewrote (4), which read: “Such registration shall remain in effect for one (1) year, unless renewed by the filing of forms as prescribed by the Secretary of State and upon payment of the Fifty Dollars ($50.00) renewal fee.”

Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, see §§ 25-4-1.101 et seq.

Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-101 et seq.

Organizations excepted from application of registration provisions of this section and reporting provisions of § 79-11-507, see § 79-11-505.

Filing annual financial statements, see § 79-11-507.

Filing reports with Secretary of State, see § 79-11-507.

Reasons for denial, suspension, or revocation of registration or exemption applied for under this section, see § 79-11-509.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities §§ 162 et seq.

3 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 187, Charities.

14 C.J.S., Charities §§ 15 et seq.

§79-11-504.
Authority of Secretary of State to promulgate rules and regulations.

The Secretary of State shall have the authority to:

Promulgate rules of procedure and regulations necessary for the administration of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, Mississippi Code of 1972, subject to the provisions of the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law.

Honor written requests from interested person for interpretative opinions regarding registration and exemptions from registration.

Publish and disseminate information to the public concerning persons subject to Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Perform any other functions and duties which may be necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, see §§ 25-4-1.101 et seq.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities § 162 et seq.

§79-11-505.
Exemption from provisions; notice of exemption; burden of proof.

The registration provisions of Section 79-11-503 and the reporting provisions of Section 79-11-507 shall not apply to the following organizations:

All educational institutions that are recognized by the State Board of Education or that are accredited by a regional accrediting association or by an organization affiliated with the National Commission on Accrediting, any foundation having an established identity with any of the aforementioned educational institutions, any other educational institution which makes the solicitation of contributions solely by its student body, alumni, faculty and trustees and their families or a library established under the laws of this state.

Fraternal, patriotic, social, educational, alumni organizations and historical societies when solicitation of contributions is made solely by their membership; however, posts of the American Legion and posts of the Veterans of Foreign Wars of the United States may utilize nonmembers to assist designated supervisors in the conduct of bingo under the Charitable Bingo Law and qualify for this exemption. This exemption shall be extended to any subsidiary of a parent or superior organization if such solicitation is made solely by the membership of the subsidiary, parent or superior organization.

Persons requesting any contributions for the relief or benefit of any individual, specified by name at the time of the solicitation, if the contributions collected are turned over to the named beneficiary, first deducting reasonable expenses for costs of banquets or social gatherings, if any, provided all fundraising functions are carried on by persons who are unpaid, directly or indirectly, for such services.

Any charitable organization which does not intend to solicit and receive and does not actually receive contributions in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) during any twelve-month period ending June 30 of any year or on such other date as prescribed by rule, provided all of its fundraising functions are carried on by persons who are unpaid for such services. However, if the gross contributions received by such charitable organization during any twelve-month period ending June 30 of any year or other date as prescribed by rule shall be in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) it shall, within thirty (30) days after the date it shall have received total contributions in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), register with and report to the Secretary of State as required by this chapter.

Any charitable organization receiving an allocation from an incorporated community chest or united fund, provided such chest or fund is complying with the provisions of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 relating to registration and filing of annual reports with the Secretary of State, and provided such organization does not actually receive, in addition to such allocation, contributions in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) during any twelve-month period ending June 30 of any year or such other date as prescribed by rule, and provided further, that all the fundraising functions of such organization are carried on by persons who are unpaid for such services. However, if the gross contributions other than such allocation received by such charitable organization during any twelve-month period ending June 30 of any year or on such other date as prescribed by rule shall be in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), it shall, within thirty (30) days after the date it shall have received such contributions in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), register with and report to the Secretary of State as required by this chapter.

All volunteer fire departments or rescue units, rural or otherwise, chartered under the laws and statutes of the State of Mississippi as nonprofit corporations.

Any humane society organized under the laws of Mississippi which receives not less than fifty percent (50%) of its annual funding from contracts with counties or municipalities for the care and keeping of estrays.

Any other organization which the Secretary of State by rule or order exempts from the registration requirements of this chapter upon finding that (i) such registration is neither necessary in the public interest nor for the protection of contributors, or (ii) such exemption shall further the objectives of compatibility with uniformity among the states.

Prior to any solicitations for contributions, each charitable organization claiming to be exempt shall file a Notice of Exemption on the forms prescribed by the Secretary of State. In any proceeding under this chapter, the burden of proving an exemption, or an exception from a definition, is upon the person claiming it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2009; Laws, 2018, ch. 370, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

The 2007 amendment added the language following “by their membership” in the first sentence of (1)(b); and made a minor stylistic change in (2).

The 2009 amendment rewrote the introductory paragraph of (1); substituted “Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00)” for “Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00)” throughout (1)(d) and (e); and inserted “or on such other date as prescribed by rule” following “June 30 of any year” throughout (1)(d) and (e).

The 2018 amendment inserted “receives not less than fifty percent (50%) of its annual funding from” in (1)(g).

Requirement that charitable organization soliciting contributions file registration statement, see § 79-11-503.

Reasons for denial, suspension, or revocation of registration or exemption applied for under this section, see § 79-11-509.

Powers and duties of Secretary of State and the Attorney General with respect to charitable organizations, see § 79-11-519.

Powers and duties of district attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys relating to charitable solicitations, see § 79-11-519.

Charitable Bingo Law generally, see §§ 97-33-51 et seq.

Section 501(c)(3) of United States Internal Revenue Code, see 26 USCS § 501(c)(3).

§79-11-507.
Reports to Secretary of State; financial statements; extension of due date for filing financial statements; administrative penalties.

Every charitable organization registered pursuant to Section 79-11-503 that shall receive in any fiscal year contributions in excess of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) and all of whose fund-raising functions are carried on by persons who are unpaid for such services, and every charitable organization registered pursuant to Section 79-11-503 whose fund-raising functions are not carried on solely by persons who are unpaid for such services shall file a financial statement for its most recently completed fiscal year with the Secretary of State. The financial statement shall be filed along with the registration statement required by Section 79-11-503 and any renewals or final report thereafter. The financial statement shall include a balance sheet and statement of income and expense and shall be consistent with forms furnished by the Secretary of State clearly setting forth the following: gross receipts and gross income from all sources, broken down into total receipts and income from each separate solicitation project or source; cost of administration; cost of solicitation; cost of programs designed to inform or educate the public; total net amount disbursed or dedicated for each major purpose, charitable or otherwise. The statement shall be signed by the president or other authorized officer and the chief fiscal officer of the organization, and shall be accompanied by an opinion signed by an independent certified public accountant that the financial statement therein fairly represents the financial operations of the organization in sufficient detail to permit public evaluation of its operations. The financial statement shall be accompanied by any and all forms required to be filed by a charitable organization with the United States Internal Revenue Service.

Every organization registered pursuant to Section 79-11-503 that shall receive in any fiscal year contributions of at least Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) but not more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) and all of whose fund-raising functions are carried on by persons who are unpaid for their services shall file a financial statement reviewed by an independent certified public accountant along with the registration statement required by Section 79-11-503 and any renewals or final report thereafter with the Secretary of State upon forms prescribed by him. The reviewed financial statement shall cover the most recently completed fiscal year and include such information as required by the Secretary of State by rule or otherwise, including, but not limited to, the gross receipts from contributions and the use of the proceeds of such contributions. The statement shall be signed by the president or other authorized officer of the organization who shall certify under penalties of perjury that the statements therein are true and correct to the best of the signer’s knowledge. The reviewed financial statement shall be accompanied by any and all forms required to be filed by a charitable organization with the United States Internal Revenue Service.

Every organization registered pursuant to Section 79-11-503 that shall receive in any fiscal year contributions not in excess of Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) and all of whose fund-raising functions are carried on by persons who are unpaid for their services shall file a financial report along with the registration statement required by Section 79-11-503 and any renewals or final report thereafter with the Secretary of State upon forms prescribed by him. Such financial report shall cover the most recently completed fiscal year and include such information as required by the Secretary of State by rule or otherwise, including, but not limited to, the gross receipts from contributions and the use of the proceeds of such contributions. The report shall be signed by the president or other authorized officer of the organization who shall certify under penalties of perjury that the statements therein are true and correct to the best of the signer’s knowledge. Such financial report shall be accompanied by any and all forms required to be filed by a charitable organization with the United States Internal Revenue Service.

Any charitable organization receiving more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) but less than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) shall, at the request of the Secretary of State, submit additional financial information, including, but not limited to, an audited financial statement prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and accompanied by an opinion signed by an independent certified public accountant that the financial statement therein fairly represents the financial operations of the organization in sufficient detail to permit public evaluation of its operations.

The Secretary of State pursuant to Section 79-11-509 may promulgate rules to provide for extensions of the due date for filing of the financial statements required by this chapter and may impose an administrative penalty against any organization which fails to comply with this section within the time prescribed, or fails to furnish such additional information as is requested by the Secretary of State within the required time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 5; Laws, 2008, ch. 559, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

The 2008 amendment rewrote the section to increase the amount in contributions charitable organizations may receive in a fiscal year before having to file a financial statement and opinion signed by independent certified CPA and to revise the threshold amounts that trigger the requirements to file.

The 2009 amendment added “or final report” following “required by Section 79-11-503 and any renewals” in the second sentence of (1) and in the first sentences of (2) and (3); and rewrote (5).

Filing annual registration statement, see § 79-11-503.

Annual registration statement, see § 79-11-503.